Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.616 is amended to read:
653.616. An employee may use sick time earned under ORS 653.606:
(1) For an  employee’s mental or physical illness, injury or health condition, need for medical
diagnosis, care or  treatment of a mental or physical illness, injury or health condition or need for
preventive medical care.
(2) For care of a family member with a mental or physical illness, injury or  health condition,
care  of  a family member who needs medical diagnosis, care, or treatment of a mental or physical
illness, injury or health condition or care of a family member who needs preventive medical care.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 659A.153, for any other purpose specified in ORS 659A.159.
(4) For a purpose specified in ORS 659A.272, notwithstanding ORS 659A.270 (1).
(5) To donate accrued sick time  to another employee if the other employee uses the donated sick
time for a purpose specified in this section  and the employer has a policy that allows an employee
to donate sick time to a coworker for a purpose specified in this section.
(6) In the event  of a public health emergency. For purposes of this subsection, a public health
emergency includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Closure of the employee’s place of business, or the school or  place of care of the employee’s
child, by order of a public official due to a public health emergency;
(b) A  determination by a lawful public health authority or by a health care provider that the
presence of the employee or the family member of the employee in the community  would jeopardize
the health of others, such that the employee must provide  self care or care for the family member;
or
(c) The exclusion of the employee from the workplace under any law or rule that requires  the
employer to exclude the employee from the workplace for health reasons.
(7) For  blood donation that is made in connection with a voluntary program for the do-
nation of blood that is approved or accredited by the American  Association of Blood Banks
or the American Red Cross.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1108 (SB 1108-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1108 (SB 1108-A) Page 2